Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

Plant Pest Act

43-6-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Plant Pest Act.”

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 1; T.C.A., § 43-515; Acts 1997, ch. 70, § 1.

Cross-References. Commercial aerial application of pesticides, title 43, ch. 8, part 3.

Insecticides, fungicides and rodenticides, title 43, ch. 8, part 1.

Pest control board, § 62-21-104.

Pest control compact, title 43, ch. 6, part 3.

Pest control operators, title 62, ch. 21.

Pest control operators, title 62, ch. 21.

Comparative Legislation. Plant pest control:

Ala. Code § 2-28-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-16-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-7-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 249.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-25-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 263.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-419 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-188.20 et seq.

Collateral References. 3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 42 et seq.

Validity of statutes, ordinances, or regulations for protection of vegetation against disease or infection. 70 A.L.R.2d 852.

Agriculture
9.2.

43-6-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part and the rules, regulations or orders made pursuant to this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agent” means any person soliciting orders for or selling or distributing nursery stock or other plants under the partial or full control of a nursery owner or dealer;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's duly authorized agents;

“Dealer” means any person not a grower of nursery stock or other plants who buys or otherwise acquires nursery stock or other plants for the purpose of reselling or otherwise distributing nursery stock or other plants independently of any control of the grower;

“Florist” means an establishment whose primary business is the retail sale of fresh cut flowers. A florist shall not be considered a dealer; provided, that the sales of rooted plant material sold by a florist shall be those used to enhance fresh cut flower arrangements, or that are intended to be grown and maintained indoors and that are not intended to be planted in the landscape;

“Greenhouses” means any glass house, screen house or other structure in which plants are grown, kept, or propagated for sale or distribution;

“Insect pests” means insects or closely related organisms in any stage of development injurious to the agricultural, horticultural, silvicultural, or other interests of the state;

“Nursery” means any grounds or premises on or in which nursery stock is grown, kept or propagated for sale or distribution;

“Nursery farmer” means any person engaged in the practice of growing or propagating nursery stock for sale, which person shall for all statutory purposes be deemed to be a farmer;

“Nursery stock” means all trees, shrubs, or other perennial plants or parts of trees, shrubs, or other perennial plants grown or kept for, or capable of propagation, distribution, or sale on a commercial basis;

“Nursery worker” means all persons employed on a nursery or property used in conjunction with a nursery, for the purpose of cultivating the soil, growing and propagating the stock, or for duties necessary for the grading, fumigating, cutting, packing, and the like, of the plants on the nursery, or the property used in conjunction with the nursery and prior to their entry into channels of commerce, shall be recognized for all statutory purposes as “farm laborers”; and

“Plant diseases” means infectious or transmissible diseases of plants, and their pathogens, including parasitic plants in any stage of development.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 2; 1959, ch. 78, § 1; 1959, ch. 144, § 1; T.C.A., § 43-516; Acts 1997, ch. 70, § 2; 1998, ch. 636, § 1.

43-6-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-6-103 (Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 3; T.C.A., § 43-517), concerning the director and the director's appointment and qualifications, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 70, § 3.

43-6-104. Rules and regulations — Force and effect.

The commissioner has the power to promulgate such rules and regulations under the authority of this part as may be necessary to prevent the further introduction of insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases into the state, and to eradicate or suppress and control such insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases occurring therein. Rules and regulations established under this part shall have the force and effect of law.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 4; T.C.A., § 43-518; Acts 1995, ch. 330, § 1; 1997, ch. 70, § 4.

43-6-105. Uniform Administrative Procedures Act applicable — Exception for quarantine procedure.

Administration of this part shall comply with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, except that an order of quarantine need not be treated as a contested case prior to receipt by the commissioner of a petition to review the quarantine. Petitions shall be heard by the commissioner as soon as reasonably possible.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 5; 1959, ch. 78, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(79); T.C.A., § 43-519; Acts 1980, ch. 472, § 2.

43-6-106. Duties of commissioner — Powers.

It is the duty of the commissioner to protect the agricultural, silvicultural and horticultural or other interests of the state from insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases and to that end the commissioner is vested with power and authority to:

Inspect or cause to be inspected by duly authorized agents or employees, plants, plant products, or other articles or things that may, in the commissioner's opinion, be capable of disseminating or carrying insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases. For this purpose, the commissioner has the power to go upon any property, including private property, posted or otherwise, and open any bundle, package, or other container containing, or thought to contain, plants, plant products, or other articles or things capable of transmitting or carrying insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases;

Supervise or cause the treatment, cutting, or destruction of plants; treat or supervise treatment of land and soil; require the elimination of specific crops and prohibit the planting of those crops in designated areas for stipulated periods; regulate planting dates, harvest dates, and other cultural practices in designated areas; require destruction, treatment, other handling of crop residues and debris in designated areas; otherwise regulate land use in designated areas, when any or all of these measures are necessary to prevent the dissemination or to control or to eradicate insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases and when rules and regulations therefor have been duly promulgated;

Inspect or cause to be inspected all nurseries, greenhouses, or other plant growing establishments of whatever kind in the state at such intervals as the commissioner may deem best and promulgate such rules and regulations governing nurseries, greenhouses and other plant growing establishments and the movement of nursery stock, plants, and plant propagating material as the commissioner may deem necessary in the eradication, control or prevention of spread of insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases;

Promulgate rules and regulations to govern the sale and distribution of nursery stock, other plants or plant propagating material by dealers and agents;

Promulgate rules and regulations under which nursery stock, other plants, plant propagating material, and plant products may be brought into this state from other states, territories, and foreign countries;

Promulgate such rules and regulations with reference to plants and plant products while in transit through this state as may be deemed necessary to prevent the introduction into and dissemination within this state of insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases;

Require of any person, firm or corporation having plants, plant products, or other articles or things likely to carry insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases, in the possession of such person, firm or corporation to give full information as to the origin and source of such plants, plant products, or other articles or things. It is a Class A misdemeanor for such person, firm or corporation to refuse to give such information if able to do so;

Declare a dangerous insect pest, pest plant, or plant disease to be a public nuisance as well as any plant or other thing infested or infected with a dangerous insect pest, pest plant, or plant disease or that has been exposed to infestation or infection and therefore likely to communicate infestation or infection;

Declare a quarantine against any area, place, nursery, forest, orchard, farm lot, or other boundary of whatever size or description, or any county or counties within this state, other states, territories, foreign countries or portion thereof in reference to dangerous insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases and prohibit the movement within the state or any part of the state or the introduction into this state from other states, territories, or foreign countries, of all plants, plant propagating material, plant products, or other articles or things including soil from quarantined places or areas that are likely to carry dangerous insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases if the quarantine is determined, after due investigation by the commissioner to be necessary in order to protect the agricultural, horticultural, and silvicultural, or other interests of this state. In such cases, the quarantine may be made absolute, or rules and regulations may be adopted prescribing the method and manner under which the prohibited articles may be moved into or within, sold, or otherwise disposed of in this state;

Intercept and inspect while in transit or after arrival at destination, all plants, plant propagating material, plant products, or other things likely to carry insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases being moved in this state, and if upon inspection, such plants, plant propagating material, plant products, or other things are found to be infested or infected with an injurious insect pest, pest plant, or plant disease, or if such material is believed to be likely to communicate or transmit an injurious insect pest, pest plant, or plant disease or is being transported in violation of any of the rules and regulations established pursuant to and under the authority of this part, then the plants, plant propagation material, plant products or other things may be treated when necessary, at the expense of the owners, and released, returned to the sender, or destroyed, the disposition to be determined under rules and regulations to be promulgated by the commissioner;

Carry on investigations relating to methods of control, eradication, and/or prevention of spread of insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases, and for that purpose may rent, lease, or purchase the necessary facilities, in accordance with existing state law pertaining to such transactions; and

Apply to courts of competent jurisdiction for writs of injunction and institute criminal proceedings for the enforcement of this part. It is the duty of the several district attorneys general to represent the commissioner when called upon to do so.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 6; 1959, ch. 78, § 3; T.C.A., § 43-520; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 1; 1995, ch. 330, § 2; 1997, ch. 70, § 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

43-6-107. Appointment of assistants — Cooperative agreements — Official publication.

The commissioner has the power and authority to:

Purchase all necessary materials, supplies, office, laboratory, and field equipment and other things, in the manner prescribed by law, and make such other expenditures as may be essential and necessary in carrying out this part within the limits of the amount appropriated by law;

Appoint, in accordance with any applicable rules or regulations of the department of human resources, such assistants, inspectors and other employees as may be required and prescribe their duties, and delegate to the assistants, inspectors and other employees such powers and authority as may be deemed proper within the limits of the power and authority conferred upon the commissioner by this part;

Enter into cooperative arrangements with any person, municipality, county and other departments of this state, and boards, officers and authorities of other states and the United States for inspection with reference to insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases and for the control and eradication of insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases, and to contribute a just proportionate share of the expenses incurred under such arrangements; and

Publish, at intervals to be determined by the commissioner, an official organ of the department of agriculture for public distribution and may from time to time publish and distribute to the public such further information as may be deemed necessary or in the public interest.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 7; T.C.A., § 43-521; Acts 1995, ch. 330, § 3; 1997, ch. 70, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 60, references to the department of personnel were changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

43-6-108. Promulgation of rules — Certified copies in evidence.

All rules and regulations made pursuant to this part shall be promulgated as provided by law; provided, that in case of emergency where it is necessary to place a quarantine to take effect immediately, promulgation may be made by proclamation of the commissioner. Printed copies of all acts, rules, regulations, quarantines, or other notices, which shall be published by the commissioner under authority granted by this part, shall be admitted as sufficient evidence of such acts, rules, regulations, quarantines or other notices in all courts and on all occasions whatsoever; provided, that the correctness of such copies be certified to by the commissioner.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 8; T.C.A., § 43-522; Acts 1997, ch. 70, § 7.

43-6-109. Pests and diseases — Special permits.

The introduction into this state of any insect pests, pest plants, or plant diseases, except under a special permit issued by the commissioner, is prohibited.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 9; T.C.A., § 43-523; Acts 1995, ch. 330, § 4; 1997, ch. 70, § 8.

43-6-110. Isolation of plants and products — Inspection.

Any person, including common carriers, who shall knowingly receive plants, plant products, or other articles or things sold, given away, carried, shipped, or delivered for carriage or shipment within the state, as to which this part and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part have not been complied with, shall be required to isolate and hold the plant, plant product, or other article or thing, unopened and unused, subject to such inspection or other disposition as may be provided by the commissioner.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 10; T.C.A., § 43-524; Acts 1997, ch. 70, § 9.

43-6-111. Liability of principal.

In construing and enforcing this part, the act, omission or failure of any official, agent, or other person acting for, or employed by, any association, partnership, corporation or other principal within the scope of such person's employment or office shall in every case be deemed the act, omission, or failure of the association, partnership, corporation or other principal as well as that of the individual.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 11; T.C.A., § 43-525.

43-6-112. Violations — Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision or requirement of this part or of the rules and regulations made under this part or of any order or notice given pursuant to this part, or who forges, counterfeits, destroys, or wrongfully or improperly, uses any certificate provided for in this part or in the rules and regulations made pursuant to this part, or who interferes with or obstructs the commissioner or any of the commissioner's duly designated employees or agents in the performance of the person's duties, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1955, ch. 8, § 12; T.C.A., § 43-526; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1997, ch. 70, § 10.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Cited: State v. Russell, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 161 (Tenn. Crim. App. Mar. 15, 2012).

43-6-113. Establishment of fees.

A nematode sample analysis fee shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Nursery stock or other plant material plant dealer certificate fees shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Florist certificate fees shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

The fee for phytosanitary certificates shall be equivalent to United States department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service fees.

The department shall have no authority under this section to assess the greenhouse plant certification fee, or any other license fee or plant certification fee established by this part against:

Any person engaged in the production of tobacco seedlings; or

Any farmer who produces and sells plants or seedlings in connection with the person's farming operations, but who is not primarily engaged in the business of producing and selling plants or seedlings, as determined by the commissioner.

Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.